District of Columbia statutes.
42-1008

Construction of power to devise inheritance given to tenant with limited estate.

Where a general and beneficial power to devise the inheritance shall be given to a tenant for life or for years, such tenant shall be deemed to possess an absolute power of disposition, within the meaning and subject to the provisions of §§ 42-1005 to 42-1007.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1353, ch. 854, § 1044
1981 Ed., § 45-108.
1973 Ed., § 45-1008.